Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB61.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "esthetics" in section 1 of the act of May 3, 1933 (P.L.242, No.86), referred to as the Cosmetology Law, is amended to read:Section 1. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Esthetics" means the practice of massaging the face, applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions or 12345678910111213141516171819202122 creams to the face, removing superfluous hair by tweezers, blade, depilatories or waxes and the dyeing of eyelashes and eyebrows.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0061PN0050 - 2 - 12345